North Carolina, session 2025, SB873.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), is directed to consult with Local Management Entities/Managed Care
Organizations (LME/MCOs) and other stakeholders to develop a plan for addressing the needs
of individuals on the NC Innovations waiver waitlist. This plan shall include the creation of a
tiered program consisting of three tiers, including a benefit capped at twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000), a benefit capped at seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), and a full waiver
benefit.
SECTION 2. No later than December 1, 2026, DHB shall submit a report on the plan
required by Section 1 of this act to the House of Representatives Committee on Health, the Senate
Committee on Health Care, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid, and the
Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
be used to implement this act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S873-v-1*